District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0574.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Short-Term Disability Insurance Benefit Protection Clarification
Temporary Amendment Act of 2026”.
Sec. 2. Section 107(j)(1) of the Universal Paid Leave Amendment Act of 2016, effective
April 7, 2017 (D.C. Law 21-264; D.C. Official Code § 32-541.07(j)(1)), is amended to read as
follows:
“(j)(1) No insurer may offset or reduce benefits or income available to an eligible
individual under an individual or group policy for temporary or short-term disability insurance
based on estimated or actual benefits the eligible individual may or does receive under this act,
regardless of the jurisdiction in which such policy was issued, executed, written, or delivered.”.
Sec. 3. Section 120a the Insurance Trade and Economic Development Amendment Act of
2000, effective November 13, 2021 (D.C. Law 24-45; D.C. Official Code § 31-2231.20a), is
amended as follows:
(a) Subsection (a) is amended to read as follows:
“(a) No insurer may offset or reduce benefits or income available to an eligible individual
under a temporary or short-term disability insurance policy, based on estimated or actual benefits
1

ENROLLED ORIGINAL
the eligible individual may or does receive under the Universal Paid Leave Amendment Act of
2016, effective April 7, 2017 (D.C. Law 21-264; D.C. Official Code § 32-541.01 et seq.),
regardless of in which jurisdiction such policy was executed, written, or delivered.”.
(b) Subsection (c) is amended to read as follows:
“(c) For the purposes of this section, the term:
“(1) “Eligible individual” shall have the same meaning as provided in section
101(6) of the Universal Paid Leave Amendment Act of 2016, effective April 7, 2017 (D.C. Law
21-264; D.C. Official Code § 32-541.01(6)).
“(2) “Self-insured employer” shall have the same meaning as provided in section
101(19A) of the Universal Paid Leave Amendment Act of 2016, effective April 7, 2017 (D.C.
Law 21-264; D.C. Official Code § 32-541.01(19A)).”.
Sec. 4. Fiscal impact statement.
The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement of the Budget Director as the fiscal impact
statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975, approved
October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 5. Effective date.
(a) This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by
the Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional
review as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved
December 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).
(b) This act shall expire after 225 days of its having taken effect.
___________________________________
Chairman
Council of the District of Columbia
_________________________________
Mayor
District of Columbia
2